Oklahoma, session 2025, SB861.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 856.3, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 856.3. Any person who attempts or commits a gang-
related offense as a condition of membership in a criminal street
gang or while in association with any criminal street gang or gang
member shall be guilty of a felony offense. Upon punishable upon
conviction, the violator shall be punished by incarceration
imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a
term of five (5) years, which shall be in addition to any other
penalty imposed. For purposes of this section, “criminal street
gang” is defined by subsection F of Section 856 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title and “gang-related offense” means those
offenses enumerated in paragraphs 1 through 16 of subsection F of
Section 856 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

Passed the Senate the 10th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 30th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 861 Page 2